Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Campaign  communication” means a communication in support of or in opposition
to a clearly identified candidate or measure, as defined in ORS 260.005 (10)(c).
(B) Notwithstanding  ORS 260.005 (10)(c)(B)(i), a campaign communication may involve
aggregate expenditures of any amount.
(b) “Synthetic media” means  an image, audio recording or video recording of an
individual’s appearance, speech or conduct that has been  intentionally manipulated with the
use of artificial intelligence techniques or similar digital technology in a manner to create a
realistic but false image, audio recording or video recording that produces:
(A) A depiction that a  reasonable person would believe is of a real individual in appear-
ance, speech or conduct but that did not actually occur in reality; and
(B) A materially different understanding or impression than a reasonable person would
have from the unaltered, original version of the image, audio recording or video recording.
(2) A campaign communication that includes any form of  synthetic media must include
a disclosure stating  that the image, audio recording or video recording has been manipulated.
(3) The Secretary of State may institute proceedings to enjoin any violation of this  sec-
tion. The Attorney General may institute proceedings to  enjoin any violation of this section
by the Secretary of State, a candidate  for the office of the Secretary of State, or any political
committee or person supporting  the Secretary of State or a candidate for the office of the
Secretary of State. In any action brought under this section, the circuit court may at any
time enter such injunctions, prohibitions or restraining orders, or take any other  actions as
the court may deem proper. A restraining order, prohibition or injunction  may be issued
under this  section without proof of injury or damage to any person. The circuit court shall
give priority to the hearing and determination under this section. The court  shall award the
prevailing party reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1571 (SB 1571-B) Page 1
(4) Upon proof of any violation  of this section, the court shall impose a civil penalty of
not more than $10,000. All penalties recovered under  this section shall be paid into the State
Treasury and credited to the General Fund.
(5) The remedy provided by this section is the exclusive remedy for a  violation of this
section.
(6) This section does not apply to:
(a) A provider of an interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. 230(f), or an
information service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153;
(b) A radio or television station, including a cable or satellite television operator, pro-
grammer or producer, that broadcasts  a campaign communication that includes synthetic
media as part of a  bona fide newscast, news interview, news documentary, or on-the-spot
coverage of a bona fide news event, if the broadcast or publication clearly acknowledges
through content or disclosure, in a manner that can be easily heard and understood or  read
by the average listener or viewer,  that there are questions about authenticity in the com-
munication;
(c) A radio or television broadcasting station, including a cable or satellite television op-
erator, programmer or producer, an internet website or an  online platform, when the sta-
tion, website or platform  is paid to broadcast or publish a campaign communication that
includes synthetic media;
(d) A regularly published newspaper, magazine or other periodical of general circulation,
including an internet or electronic publication, or an internet service or  website provider,
that publishes a campaign communication that includes synthetic media, if the  communi-
cation includes a statement that the synthetic media contained therein does not accurately
represent a ballot issue or candidate; or
(e) Content that constitutes satire, parody or that is substantially dependent on the
ability of an individual to physically or verbally impersonate a candidate without the  use of
technology.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 260.
SECTION 3.  ORS 260.345 is amended to read:
260.345. (1) Any elector may file with  any filing officer a written complaint alleging that a vio-
lation of an election law or  rule adopted by the Secretary of State under ORS chapters 246 to 260
has occurred and stating the reason for believing that the violation occurred and  any evidence re-
lating to it. A complaint and any evidence relating to  it may be filed electronically. A complaint
alleging a violation involving the Secretary of State, a candidate for the office of  Secretary of State,
or any political committee or person supporting the Secretary of State or a candidate  for the office
of Secretary of State may be filed with the Attorney General.  The Secretary of State or Attorney
General shall not accept an anonymous complaint.
(2) The Secretary of State  by rule shall prescribe the procedure for processing a complaint filed
with any person  other than the Secretary of State. If the complaint concerns the Secretary of State,
any candidate for the office of the Secretary of State,  or any political committee or person sup-
porting the candidacy of the  Secretary of State or of another person for the office of Secretary of
State, the complaint  and any additional information relating to the complaint shall be sent to the
Attorney General.
(3) Upon receipt of a complaint  under subsection (1) or (2) of this section the Secretary of State
or Attorney General immediately shall examine the complaint  to determine whether a violation of
an election law or rule has occurred and shall make any investigation the Secretary of State or
Attorney General considers necessary. Except as  provided in this subsection, within three business
days of determining that an investigation is necessary to determine whether a violation  of an
election law or rule has  occurred, the Secretary of State or Attorney General shall notify the person
who is  the subject of the complaint that an investigation will take place. If the Secretary of State
or Attorney General receives a complaint or complaints involving 10 or more  individuals, political
committees or petition committees in any 48-hour  period, the Secretary of State or Attorney General
Enrolled Senate Bill 1571 (SB 1571-B) Page 2
need not notify the persons who are the  subjects of those complaints within three business days of
receiving the complaints but shall notify  those persons not later than 10 business days after deter-
mining that an investigation is necessary  to determine whether a violation of election law or rule
has occurred.
(4) If the Secretary of State believes after an investigation under subsection (3) of this section
that a violation of an election law or rule has occurred, the secretary:
(a) In the case of a violation that is subject  to a penalty under ORS 260.993, immediately shall
report the findings  to the Attorney General and request prosecution. If the violation involves the
Attorney General, a candidate for that  office or a political committee or person supporting or op-
posing the Attorney General or  a candidate for that office, the Secretary of State shall appoint an-
other prosecutor for that purpose;
(b) In the case of a violation not subject to a penalty under ORS 260.537 or 260.993  or section
1 of this 2024 Act , may impose a civil penalty under ORS 260.995; [ or]
(c) In the case of a violation under  ORS 260.537, may institute civil proceedings in the manner
described in ORS 260.537 ; or
(d) In  the case of a violation under section 1 of this 2024 Act, may institute civil pro-
ceedings in the manner described in section 1 of this 2024 Act .
(5) Upon receipt of a complaint or report under subsection (1), (2)  or (4) of this section involving
an alleged violation subject to a penalty  under ORS 260.993 or an alleged violation of ORS 260.537
or section 1  of this 2024 Act , the Attorney General or other prosecutor immediately shall examine
the complaint or  report to determine whether a violation of an election law has occurred. If the
Attorney General or prosecutor determines that a violation has occurred, the  Attorney General or
prosecutor immediately shall begin prosecution or civil proceedings in the name of the state. The
Attorney General or other  prosecutor shall have the same powers in any county of this state as the
district attorney for the county.
(6) Upon  receipt of a complaint under subsection (1) or (2) of this section involving an alleged
violation  of  an election law or rule not subject to a penalty under ORS 260.537 or 260.993  or section
1 of this 2024 Act , the Attorney  General shall examine the complaint to determine whether a vio-
lation of an election law or rule has occurred and shall make any investigation the  Attorney Gen-
eral considers necessary. If the Attorney General believes after an investigation that a  violation of
an election law or rule has occurred, the Attorney General may impose a civil  penalty under ORS
260.995.
(7) In the case of an alleged violation subject to a civil penalty under ORS  260.995 or an alleged
violation of ORS 260.537  or section 1  of this 2024 Act , a complaint shall be filed by an elector
under this section no later  than 90 days following the election at which a violation of an election
law or rule is alleged to have occurred, or 90 days following  the date the violation of an election
law or rule is alleged to have occurred, whichever is later.
(8) A filing officer having  reason to believe that a violation of an election law or rule has oc-
curred shall proceed promptly as  though the officer had received a complaint. Except as provided
in ORS 260.234, a filing officer shall proceed under this subsection  no later than two years following
the election at which a violation of an election law or  rule is alleged to have occurred, or two years
following the date the violation of an election law or rule is alleged to have  occurred, whichever
is later. If a filing officer has not proceeded  within two years because of fraud, deceit, misleading
representation or the filing officer could not  have reasonably discovered the alleged violation, the
filing officer shall proceed no later than five years following  the election at which a violation of an
election law or rule is alleged to have occurred, or  five years following the date the violation of an
election law or rule is alleged to have occurred, whichever is later.
SECTION 4. The Secretary of  State may adopt rules necessary to implement section 1
of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1571 (SB 1571-B) Page 3
Passed by Senate February 26, 2024
Repassed by Senate March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1571 (SB 1571-B) Page 4